Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1903
Grants; eligible applicants.

Any city, village, county, or agency thereof or any state agency responsible for the upkeep of state-owned real property may apply for a grant from the Nebraska Tree Recovery Program. Any civic group, tree advisory board, or other entity working with a governmental agency on tree planting, removal, and replacement may apply for a grant under the program.

Laws 1994, LB 695, § 3.